Illinois, session 104th, SB1533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act 5is amended by changing Section 18 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 375/18)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 578)7    Sec. 18. Each person, other than a seller or holder, who 8signs a retail installment contract may be held liable only to 9the extent that he actually receives the motor vehicle 10described or identified in the contract, except that a parent 11or spouse or any other person listed as an owner of the motor 12vehicle on the Certificate of Title issued for the motor 13vehicle who co-signs such retail installment contract may be 14held liable to the full extent of the deferred payment price 15notwithstanding such parent or spouse or any other person 16listed as an owner has not actually received the motor vehicle 17described or identified in the contract and except to the 18extent such person other than a seller or holder, signs in the 19capacity of a guarantor of collection.20    The obligation of such guarantor is secondary, and not 21primary. The obligation arises only after the seller or holder 22has diligently taken all ordinary legal means to collect the 23debt from the primary obligor, but has not received full   SB1533- 2 -LRB104 09584 SPS 19647 b1payment from such primary obligor or obligors, or after the 2primary obligor has become insolvent, or service of summons 3cannot be obtained on the primary obligor, or it is otherwise 4apparent that it is useless to proceed against the primary 5obligor.6    No provisions in a retail installment contract obligating 7such guarantor are valid unless: 8        (1) there appears below the signature space provided 9    for such guarantor the following: 10        "I hereby guarantee the collection of the above 11    described amount upon failure of the seller named herein 12    to collect said amount from the buyer named herein."; and 13        (2) the guarantor, in addition to signing the retail 14    installment contract, signs a separate instrument in the 15    following form:16"EXPLANATION OF GUARANTOR'S OBLIGATION 17        You ........... (name of guarantor) by signing the 18    retail installment contract and this document are agreeing 19    that you will pay $......... (total deferred payment 20    price) for the purchase of ........... (description of 21    goods or services) purchased by ............ (name of 22    buyer) from ........... (name of seller). 23        Your obligation arises only after the seller or holder 24    has attempted through the use of the court system to 25    collect this amount from the buyer. 26        If the seller cannot collect this amount from the   SB1533- 3 -LRB104 09584 SPS 19647 b1    buyer, you will be obligated to pay even though you are not 2    entitled to any of the goods or services furnished. The 3    seller is entitled to sue you in court for the payment of 4    the amount due."5    The instrument must be printed, typed, or otherwise 6reproduced in a size and style equal to at least 8 point bold 7type, may contain no other matter (except a union printing 8label) than above set forth and must bear the signature of the 9co-signer and no other person. The seller must give the 10co-signer a copy of the retail installment contract and a copy 11of the co-signer statement. 12(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.)